Wisconsin, session 2025, SB570.
do enact as follows:SB570,11Section 1. 36.47 of the statutes is created to read:SB570,2,2236.47 Parkinson’s disease registry. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB570,2,53(a) “Department” means the department of population health sciences, or its 4successor, at the University of Wisconsin-Madison School of Medicine and Public 5Health.SB570,2,66(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning given in s. 155.01 (6).SB570,2,87(b) “Health care provider” means a physician, surgeon, physician assistant, or 8nurse practitioner.SB570,2,149(c) “Parkinsonism” means a condition that causes a combination of the 10movement abnormalities seen in Parkinson’s disease, including tremor at rest, slow 11movements, muscle rigidity, stooped posture, or unsteady or shuffling gait, which 12often overlap with and can evolve from what appears to be Parkinson’s disease. 13“Parkinsonism” includes multiple system atrophy, dementia with Lewy bodies, 14corticobasal degeneration, and progressive supranuclear palsy.SB570,3,215(d) “Parkinson’s disease” means a chronic and progressive neurologic disorder 16resulting from deficiency of the neurotransmitter dopamine as the consequence of 17specific degenerative changes in the basal ganglia, which is characterized by tremor 1at rest, slow movements, muscle rigidity, stooped posture, and unsteady or 2shuffling gait.SB570,3,43(2) Consultation by the department of health services. The 4department of health services may do all of the following:SB570,3,65(a) Assist the department in the establishment and maintenance of a 6Parkinson’s disease registry, as provided under sub. (3).SB570,3,87(b) Make recommendations to the department on the data to be collected in 8the Parkinson’s disease registry.SB570,3,99(c) Advise the department on the Parkinson’s disease registry.SB570,3,1110(d) Make recommendations to the department on the best practices for the 11establishment of the Parkinson’s disease registry under sub. (3).SB570,3,1712(3) Parkinson’s disease registry. (a) By no later than the first day of the 1319th month beginning after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts 14date], the department shall, after consultation with the department of health 15services, establish and maintain a Parkinson’s disease registry for the collection, 16storage, and dissemination of information about the incidence and prevalence of, 17and outcomes related to, Parkinson’s disease and parkinsonisms in this state.SB570,3,1918(b) The department shall collect and store in the Parkinson’s disease registry 19data reported under s. 255.18 (2).SB570,3,2120(c) The department shall prescribe the format for reporting information to the 21department under s. 255.18 (2).SB570,4,422(d) The department shall create, and regularly update, a list of information 23that shall be reported, subject to s. 255.18 (2) (d), to the department under s. 255.18 24(2). The list shall include the incident of a patient’s Parkinson’s disease or 1parkinsonism; necessary triggering diagnostic conditions, consistent with the latest 2version of the International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related 3Health Problems; resulting case data on issues including diagnosis, treatment, 4health, functional outcomes, and survival; and patient demographic information.SB570,4,95(e) The University of Wisconsin-Madison may enter into agreements in order 6for the department to securely and confidentially receive information from data 7reporting entities, including any entities providing electronic medical records 8services, related to Parkinson’s disease testing, diagnosis, treatment, and health 9outcomes.SB570,4,1410(f) 1. The University of Wisconsin-Madison may enter into agreements in 11order for the department to disclose data collected in the Parkinson’s disease 12registry to another state’s Parkinson’s disease registry, a federal Parkinson’s 13disease control agency, a local health officer, or a researcher who proposes to 14conduct research on Parkinson’s disease.SB570,4,19152. Before disclosing data containing confidential information to an entity 16under subd. 1., the University of Wisconsin-Madison shall require the entity to 17specify the purpose for the requested disclosure, agree in writing to maintain the 18confidentiality of the information and, if the entity is a researcher, provide all of the 19following to the University of Wisconsin-Madison:SB570,4,2020a. A written protocol to perform research.SB570,4,2421b. Documentation of approval of the research protocol by an institutional 22review board of a domestic institution that has a federalwide assurance approved by 23the office for human research protections of the federal department of health and 24human services.SB570,5,31c. Documentation that demonstrates to the University of Wisconsin-Madison’s 2satisfaction that the researcher has established procedures and has the capability 3to maintain the confidentiality of the information.SB570,5,84(4) Website. (a) By no later than the first day of the 19th month beginning 5after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], the department 6shall establish and maintain a public website dedicated to the Parkinson’s disease 7registry under sub. (3). The department shall include on the website all of the 8following:SB570,5,1091. Annual or more frequent downloadable reports on the incidence and 10prevalence of Parkinson’s disease in this state.SB570,5,13112. In a dashboard or in a downloadable format, relevant data, as determined 12by the department, about Parkinson’s disease and parkinsonisms for the 5-year 13period prior to the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date].SB570,5,15143. In a dashboard or in a downloadable format, other helpful resources about 15Parkinson’s disease, as determined by the department.SB570,5,1716(b) By no later than January 1 of each year, the department shall update the 17information specified in par. (a) 1. on the website maintained under par. (a).SB570,5,2018(c) The department shall publish on its website notice of the reporting 19requirement under s. 255.18 no fewer than 90 days before the reporting 20requirement takes effect.SB570,5,2321(5) Confidentiality. (a) Any information reported to the department under 22s. 255.18 (2) that could identify an individual who is the subject of the report or, if 23applicable, a health care provider submitting the report is confidential.SB570,6,224(b) To ensure privacy, the department shall use a coding system for the data 1stored in the Parkinson’s disease registry that removes any identifying information 2about an individual who is the subject of a report under s. 255.18.SB570,6,63(c) 1. If the University of Wisconsin-Madison or the department discloses 4confidential information as authorized under sub. (3) (f), the University of 5Wisconsin-Madison or department may include in the disclosure only the 6information necessary for the purpose specified under sub. (3) (f) 2.SB570,6,1072. A person who obtains confidential information from the University of 8Wisconsin-Madison or the department under sub. (3) (f) may use the information 9only for the purpose specified under sub. (3) (f) 2. and may not redisclose the 10information.SB570,6,1311(d) The department shall maintain an accurate record of all persons given 12access to confidential information under this section. The record shall include all of 13the following:SB570,6,14141. The name of the person authorizing access.SB570,6,15152. The title, address, and organizational affiliation of any person given access.SB570,6,16163. The dates of access.SB570,6,17174. The specific purpose for which the information is to be used.SB570,6,1918(e) The department shall make the records maintained under par. (d) 19available for public inspection during the department’s normal operating hours.SB570,6,2420(f) Confidential information under this section is not available for subpoena 21and may not be disclosed, discoverable, or compelled to be produced in any civil, 22criminal, administrative, or other proceeding. Confidential information under this 23section is not admissible as evidence in any civil, criminal, administrative, or other 24tribunal or court for any reason.SB570,21Section 2. 146.82 (2) (a) 8m. of the statutes is created to read:SB570,7,62146.82 (2) (a) 8m. To the department of population health sciences, or its 3successor, at the University of Wisconsin-Madison School of Medicine and Public 4Health under s. 255.18 (2) and to the persons specified under s. 36.47 (3) (f). The 5release of a patient health care record under this subdivision shall be limited to the 6information specified in the list under s. 36.47 (3) (d).SB570,37Section 3. 255.18 of the statutes is created to read:SB570,7,98255.18 Parkinson’s disease registry reporting. (1) Definitions. In this 9section: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb570 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb570 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB570 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB570 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB570: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting